Florida, session 2026, SB688.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 57 58 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 59 456.47, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 60 456.47âUse of telehealth to provide services.â 61 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 62 (b)ââTelehealth providerâ means any individual who provides 63 health care and related services using telehealth and who is 64 licensed or certified under s. 393.17; part III of chapter 401; 65 chapter 457; chapter 458; chapter 459; chapter 460; chapter 461; 66 chapter 462; chapter 463; chapter 464; chapter 465; chapter 466; 67 chapter 467; part I, part III, part IV, part V, part X, part 68 XIII, or part XIV of chapter 468; chapter 478; chapter 480; part 69 I, part II, or part III of chapter 483; chapter 484; chapter 70 486; chapter 490; or chapter 491; who is licensed under a 71 multistate health care licensure compact of which Florida is a 72 member state; or who is registered under and complies with 73 subsection (4). 74 Section 2.âChapter 462, Florida Statutes, entitled 75 âNaturopathy,â is renamed as âNaturopathic Medicine.â 76 Section 3.âSection 462.001, Florida Statutes, is created to 77 read: 78 462.001âLegislative findings and intent.âThe Legislature 79 finds that the interest of public health requires modernization 80 of regulation related to naturopathy in this state. Since 1927, 81 when Florida first regulated naturopathy, the profession and its 82 role in the health care industry have evolved, including the 83 distinction that exists today between naturopathy and 84 naturopathic medicine, and this chapter reflects that evolution. 85 It is the intent of the Legislature to remove the near total ban 86 on the profession which has been in effect in this state since 87 1959 and ensure that: 88 (1)âNaturopaths can freely offer naturopathy in this state. 89 (2)âThe safe and effective practice of naturopathic 90 medicine can once again take place in this state through 91 licensure of naturopathic doctors who meet minimum standards of 92 education and training and who are held accountable for the safe 93 practice of naturopathic medicine. 94 Section 4.âSection 462.002, Florida Statutes, is created to 95 read: 96 462.002âExceptions.â 97 (1)âThis chapter does not apply to: 98 (a)âOther duly licensed health care practitioners acting 99 within their respective scopes of practice, as authorized by 100 statute. 101 (b)âStudents practicing under the direct supervision of a 102 licensed naturopathic doctor as part of a preceptorship program 103 while enrolled in a college or university program that is 104 accredited by, or has candidacy status with, the Council on 105 Naturopathic Medical Education or an equivalent accrediting body 106 for the naturopathic medical profession which is recognized by 107 the United States Department of Education or the board. 108 (c)âNaturopathic residents practicing under the direct 109 supervision of a licensed naturopathic doctor at a residency 110 site recognized by the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education 111 or by an equivalent accrediting body for the naturopathic 112 medical profession which is recognized by the United States 113 Department of Education or the board. 114 (d)âA naturopathic doctor who holds an active license in 115 another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada and is 116 performing naturopathic procedures or demonstrating equipment or 117 supplies for educational purposes in a board-approved continuing 118 education program. 119 (e)âThe practice of the religious tenets of any church in 120 this state. 121 (f)âThe domestic administration of recognized family 122 remedies. 123 (2)âThis chapter does not prohibit: 124 (a)âA person who sells a dietary supplement from providing 125 information about the dietary supplement. 126 (b)âAny person: 127 1.âNot licensed as a naturopathic doctor from employing in 128 her or his occupation Ayurveda, herbalism, homeopathy, 129 naturopathy as defined in s. 462.003, nutrition, traditional 130 Chinese medicine, or other natural therapy included as part of 131 the practice of naturopathic medicine as defined in s. 462.003; 132 or 133 2.âFrom using such terms as âcertified naturopath,â 134 ânaturopath,â ânaturopathy,â âtraditional naturopath,â or 135 âtraditional naturopathy,â provided that the person does not: 136 a.âUse a title protected under s. 462.006(1); or 137 b.âRepresent herself or himself as, or otherwise assume the 138 character or appearance of, a naturopathic doctor. 139 Section 5.âSection 462.01, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 140 as section 462.003, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 141 462.003 462.01âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the 142 term: 143 (1)ââBoardâ means the Board of Naturopathic Medicine. 144 (2)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 145 (3)ââNaturopathic doctorâ means a person who is licensed 146 under this chapter to practice naturopathic medicine. 147 (4)ââNaturopathic medicineâ or âthe practice of 148 naturopathic medicineâ means the diagnosis, prevention, and 149 treatment by a naturopathic doctor of any deformity, disease, 150 injury, pain, or other mental or physical condition using 151 botanical or fungal extracts, clinical nutrition, counseling 152 techniques, dietary supplements, environmental medicine, 153 homeopathic remedies, imaging studies, laboratory testing, 154 lifestyle medicine, natural substances, physical examination, or 155 physical medicine in a manner consistent with the education 156 offered by naturopathic doctoral degree programs accredited by, 157 or having candidacy status with, the Council on Naturopathic 158 Medical Education or another accrediting agency recognized by 159 the United States Department of Education or the board, and 160 applied in a manner consistent with the principles of 161 naturopathic medicine and the naturopathic therapeutic order 162 defined herein. The term does not include any of the following: 163 (a)âPrescribing, dispensing, or administering any legend or 164 prescription drug other than natural, nonpharmacologic 165 substances, including, but not limited to, vitamin B12. 166 (b)âPerforming any surgical procedure. 167 (c)âPracticing or claiming to practice as a medical doctor 168 or physician, an osteopathic physician, a dentist, a podiatric 169 physician, an optometrist, a psychologist, a nurse practitioner, 170 a physician assistant, a chiropractic physician, a physical 171 therapist, an acupuncturist, a midwife, a licensed dietitian, or 172 any other health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001. 173 (d)âUsing general or spinal anesthetics. 174 (e)âAdministering ionizing radioactive substances. 175 (f)âPerforming chiropractic or osteopathic adjustments or 176 manipulations that include highâvelocity thrusts at or beyond 177 the end range of normal joint motion, unless the naturopathic 178 doctor is also licensed as a chiropractic physician or an 179 osteopathic physician. 180 (g)âPerforming acupuncture, unless the naturopathic doctor 181 is also licensed as an acupuncturist. 182 (h)âManaging labor and delivery, unless the naturopathic 183 doctor is also a licensed midwife or physician. 184 (5)ââNaturopathic therapeutic orderâ means the principle 185 defined by the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians 186 to guide naturopathic doctors in reducing or resolving a 187 patientâs symptoms by addressing the root cause of a patientâs 188 condition while using the least therapeutic force necessary. 189 (6)(1)ââNatureopathyâ and âNaturopathy,â which is shall be 190 construed as synonymous with âtraditional naturopathyâ and is 191 understood to be distinct from naturopathic medicine, means the 192 traditional, noninvasive health practice offered by naturopaths 193 and traditional naturopaths focusing on education about natural 194 practices and substances that can be used to promote general 195 health and well-being terms and mean the use and practice of 196 psychological, mechanical, and material health sciences to aid 197 in purifying, cleansing, and normalizing human tissues for the 198 preservation or restoration of health, according to the 199 fundamental principles of anatomy, physiology, and applied 200 psychology, as may be required. Naturopathic practice employs, 201 among other agencies, phytotherapy, dietetics, psychotherapy, 202 suggestotherapy, hydrotherapy, zone therapy, biochemistry, 203 external applications, electrotherapy, mechanotherapy, 204 mechanical and electrical appliances, hygiene, first aid, 205 sanitation, and heliotherapy; provided, however, that nothing in 206 this chapter shall be held or construed to authorize any 207 naturopathic physician licensed hereunder to practice materia 208 medica or surgery or chiropractic medicine, nor shall the 209 provisions of this law in any manner apply to or affect the 210 practice of osteopathic medicine, chiropractic medicine, 211 Christian Science, or any other treatment authorized and 212 provided for by law for the cure or prevention of disease and 213 ailments. 214 (2)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 215 (7)ââPrinciples of naturopathic medicineâ means the 216 philosophic foundation of naturopathic medical education and 217 practice as set forth by the American Association of 218 Naturopathic Physicians or the board and embodied in the 219 education offered by naturopathic doctoral degree programs 220 accredited by, or having candidacy status with, the Council on 221 Naturopathic Medical Education or another accrediting agency 222 recognized by the United States Department of Education or the 223 board, and includes the following principles: 224 (a)âThe healing power of nature. 225 (b)âIdentify and treat the causes. 226 (c)âFirst, do no harm. 227 (d)âDoctor as teacher. 228 (e)âTreat the whole person. 229 (f)âPrevention. 230 Section 6.âSection 462.004, Florida Statutes, is created to 231 read: 232 462.004âBoard of Naturopathic Medicine.â 233 (1)âThe Board of Naturopathic Medicine is created within 234 the department and shall be composed of seven members appointed 235 by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. All members must be 236 residents of this state. 237 (2)(a)âFour members of the board must be licensed 238 naturopathic doctors. The first four members appointed to the 239 board must meet the criteria specified in paragraphs s. 240 462.007(1)(b), (c), and (f). 241 (b)âTwo members of the board must be physicians licensed 242 under chapter 458 or chapter 459. 243 (c)âOne member of the board must never have been licensed 244 as a naturopathic doctor, a physician, or a practitioner of any 245 other closely related profession. 246 (3)âMembers shall serve for 4-year staggered terms. A 247 vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the 248 original appointment. A member whose term expires shall serve 249 until the Governor appoints the memberâs successor. 250 (4)âAll provisions of chapter 456 relating to regulatory 251 boards shall apply to the board. 252 Section 7.âSection 462.023, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 253 as section 462.005, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 254 462.005 462.023âRulemaking authority; fees powers and 255 duties of the department.âThe board and the department shall 256 adopt rules to implement this chapter. The department may adopt 257 such rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this 258 chapter, initiate disciplinary action as provided by this 259 chapter, and shall establish fees based on its estimates of the 260 revenue required to administer this chapter but shall not exceed 261 the fee amounts provided in this chapter. The department shall 262 not adopt any rules which would cause any person who was not 263 licensed in accordance with this chapter on July 1, 1959, and 264 had not been a resident of the state for 2 years prior to such 265 date, to become licensed. 266 Section 8.âSection 462.006, Florida Statutes, is created to 267 read: 268 462.006âLicense required.â 269 (1)âUnless licensed under this chapter, a person may not 270 practice naturopathic medicine in this state and may not 271 promote, identify, or describe herself or himself as a âdoctor 272 of naturopathic medicineâ or a ânaturopathic doctorâ or use the 273 abbreviations âN.D.â or âN.M.D.â 274 (2)âA person who violates this section commits a 275 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 276 775.082 or s. 775.083. 277 Section 9.âSection 462.007, Florida Statutes, is created to 278 read: 279 462.007âLicensure by examination.â 280 (1)âAny person desiring to be licensed as a naturopathic 281 doctor must apply to the department on forms furnished by the 282 department. The department shall license each applicant who 283 completes the application form and who the board certifies has 284 met all of the following criteria: 285 (a)âIs at least 21 years of age. 286 (b)âHas received a bachelorâs degree from one of the 287 following: 288 1.âA college or university accredited by an accrediting 289 agency recognized by the United States Department of Education 290 or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or a successor 291 entity recognized by the board; 292 2.âA college or university in Canada which is a member of 293 Universities Canada or a successor entity recognized by the 294 board; or 295 3.âA college or university in a foreign country, other than 296 Canada, if the applicant has provided evidence that her or his 297 educational credentials are deemed equivalent to those provided 298 in the United States or Canada. To have educational credentials 299 deemed equivalent, the applicant must provide her or his foreign 300 educational credentials, including transcripts, course 301 descriptions or syllabi, and diplomas, to a nationally 302 recognized educational credential evaluating agency approved by 303 the board for the evaluation and determination of equivalency of 304 the foreign educational credentials. 305 (c)âHas received a naturopathic doctoral degree from a 306 college or program accredited by, or having candidacy status 307 with, the Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or another 308 accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of 309 Education or the board. 310 (d)âIs of good moral character. 311 (e)âHas submitted to background screening in accordance 312 with s. 456.0135. 313 (f)âHas obtained a passing score on Part I - Biomedical 314 Science Examination and Part II - Core Clinical Science 315 Examination of the competency-based national Naturopathic 316 Physician Licensing Examination administered by the North 317 American Board of Naturopathic Examiners, or an equivalent 318 examination offered by an equivalent or successor entity, as 319 approved by the board. 320 (2)âThe board may not certify to the department for 321 licensure any applicant who is under investigation in another 322 jurisdiction for an offense that would constitute a violation of 323 this chapter or chapter 456 until the investigation has been 324 completed. 325 (3)âIf the board determines that an applicant for licensure 326 does not meet all of the requirements of this section to the 327 boardâs satisfaction, it may take one of the following actions: 328 (a)âRefuse to certify to the department an application for 329 licensure. 330 (b)âCertify to the department an application for licensure 331 with restrictions on the scope of practice of the naturopathic 332 doctor. 333 (c)âCertify to the department an application for licensure 334 with a probationary period for the applicant, subject to such 335 conditions as the board specifies, including, but not limited 336 to, requiring the naturopathic doctor to submit to treatment, 337 attend continuing education courses, submit to reexamination, or 338 work under the supervision of another naturopathic doctor. 339 Section 10.âSection 462.008, Florida Statutes, is created 340 to read: 341 462.008âLicensure by endorsement.âThe department shall 342 issue a license to practice naturopathic medicine by endorsement 343 to an applicant who, upon applying to the department on forms 344 furnished by the department, the board certifies has met the 345 requirements for licensure by endorsement under s. 456.0145. 346 Section 11.âSection 462.08, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 347 as section 462.009, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 348 462.009 462.08âRenewal of license to practice naturopathic 349 medicine naturopathy.â 350 (1)âIn order to continue practicing naturopathic medicine 351 in this state, each licensed naturopathic doctor must 352 licenseholder shall biennially renew her or his license to 353 practice naturopathic medicine naturopathy. The department shall 354 renew a license upon receipt of the renewal application, 355 verification of The applicant must furnish to the department 356 such evidence as it requires of the applicantâs compliance with 357 s. 462.011 s. 462.18, relating to continuing education 358 educational requirements, and receipt of a nonrefundable. The 359 biennial renewal fee, the amount of which shall be determined by 360 the department but which may not exceed $1,000, must be paid at 361 the time the application for renewal of the license is filed. 362 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules establishing 363 procedures for the biennial renewal of licenses under this 364 chapter. 365 Section 12.âSection 462.18, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 366 as section 462.011, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 367 462.011 462.18âContinuing education Educational 368 requirements.â 369 (1)âAt the time each licensee renews shall renew her or his 370 license as otherwise provided in s. 462.009 this chapter, each 371 licensee must submit, in addition to the payment of the regular 372 renewal fee, shall furnish to the department satisfactory 373 evidence that, in the preceding biennial period, the licensee 374 has completed the continuing education requirements of this 375 section. 376 (2)âThe board shall require each licensee to complete at 377 least 60 hours of continuing education during each biennial 378 renewal period. 379 (a)âThe board shall approve organizations that accredit 380 naturopathic continuing education providers, including, but not 381 limited to, the American Association of Naturopathic Physicians 382 and the North American Naturopathic Continuing Education 383 Accreditation Council. 384 (b)âThe determination of whether substitute continuing 385 education programs are permissible is solely within the 386 discretion of the board. 387 (3)âThe licensee must use the electronic continuing 388 education tracking system developed by the department under s. 389 456.0361 to demonstrate compliance with the continuing education 390 requirements of this section year preceding each such 391 application for renewal, the licensee has attended the 2-day 392 educational program as promulgated and conducted by the Florida 393 Naturopathic Physicians Association, Inc., or, as a substitute 394 therefor, the equivalent of that program as approved by the 395 department. The department shall send a written notice to this 396 effect to every person holding a valid license to practice 397 naturopathy within this state at least 30 days prior to May 1 in 398 each even-numbered year, directed to the last known address of 399 such licensee, and shall enclose with the notice proper blank 400 forms for application for annual license renewal. All of the 401 details and requirements of the aforesaid educational program 402 shall be adopted and prescribed by the department. In the event 403 of national emergencies, or for sufficient reason, the 404 department shall have the power to excuse the naturopathic 405 physicians as a group or as individuals from taking this 406 postgraduate course. 407 (2)âThe determination of whether a substitute annual 408 educational program is necessary shall be solely within the 409 discretion of the department. 410 Section 13.âSection 462.19, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 411 as section 462.012, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 412 462.012 462.19âRenewal of license; Inactive status; renewal 413 and reactivation of inactive license.â 414 (1)âThe department shall renew a license upon receipt of 415 the renewal application and fee. 416 (2)âA licensee may request that her or his license be 417 placed in an inactive status by making application to the 418 department and paying a fee in an amount set by the department 419 not to exceed $50. 420 (2)âThe board shall adopt rules relating to the 421 reactivation of licenses that have become inactive and the 422 renewal of inactive licenses. The rules must include continuing 423 education requirements as a condition for reactivating a 424 license. The continuing education requirements for reactivating 425 a license may not be fewer than 20 classroom hours for each year 426 the license was inactive. 427 Section 14.âSection 462.14, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 428 as section 462.017, Florida Statutes, and amended to read: 429 462.017 462.14âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by 430 the department.â 431 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 432 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 433 (a)âAttempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a license 434 to practice naturopathic medicine by bribery, by fraudulent 435 misrepresentation, or through an error of the department. 436 (b)âHaving a license to practice naturopathic medicine 437 revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, including the 438 denial of licensure, by the licensing authority of another 439 state, territory, or country. 440 (c)âBeing convicted or found guilty, regardless of 441 adjudication, of a crime in any jurisdiction which directly 442 relates to the practice of naturopathic medicine or to the 443 ability to practice naturopathic medicine. Any plea of nolo 444 contendere shall be considered a conviction for purposes of this 445 chapter. 446 (d)âEngaging in false, deceptive, or misleading advertising 447 related to the practice of naturopathic medicine. 448 (e)âAdvertising, practicing, or attempting to practice 449 under a name other than oneâs own. 450 (f)âFailing to report to the department any person who the 451 licensee knows is in violation of this chapter or of the rules 452 of the department. However, a person who the licensee knows is 453 unable to practice naturopathic medicine with reasonable skill 454 and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, 455 drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material, or 456 as a result of a mental or physical condition, may be reported 457 to a consultant operating an impaired practitioner program as 458 described in s. 456.076 rather than to the department. 459 (g)âAiding, assisting, procuring, employing, or advising 460 any unlicensed person to practice naturopathic medicine contrary 461 to this chapter or to a rule of the department. 462 (h)âFailing to perform any statutory or legal obligation 463 placed upon a licensed naturopathic doctor physician. 464 (i)âMaking or filing a report which the licensee knows to 465 be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a report 466 or record required by state or federal law, willfully impeding 467 or obstructing such filing or inducing another person to do so. 468 Such reports or records shall include only those which are 469 signed in the capacity as a licensed naturopathic doctor 470 physician. 471 (j)âPaying or receiving any commission, bonus, kickback, or 472 rebate, or engaging in any split-fee arrangement in any form 473 whatsoever with a physician, organization, agency, or person, 474 either directly or indirectly, for patients referred to 475 providers of health care goods and services, including, but not 476 limited to, hospitals, nursing homes, clinical laboratories, 477 ambulatory surgical centers, or pharmacies. The provisions of 478 This paragraph shall not be construed to prevent a naturopathic 479 physician from receiving a fee for professional consultation 480 services. 481 (k)âExercising influence in within a patient-naturopathic 482 doctor patient-physician relationship for purposes of engaging a 483 patient in sexual activity. A patient is shall be presumed to be 484 incapable of giving free, full, and informed consent to sexual 485 activity with her or his naturopathic doctor physician. 486 (l)âMaking deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations 487 in the practice of naturopathic medicine or employing a trick or 488 scheme in the practice of naturopathic medicine when such scheme 489 or trick fails to conform to the generally prevailing standards 490 of treatment in the medical community. 491 (m)âSoliciting patients, either personally or through an 492 agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation, undue influence, 493 or a form of overreaching or vexatious conduct. A âsolicitationâ 494 is any communication which directly or implicitly requests an 495 immediate oral response from the recipient. 496 (k)(n)âFailing to keep written medical records justifying 497 the course of treatment of the patient, including, but not 498 limited to, patient histories, examination results, test 499 results, X rays, and records of the prescribing, dispensing and 500 administering of drugs. 501 (l)(o)âExercising influence on the patient or client in 502 such a manner as to exploit the patient or client for the 503 financial gain of the licensee or of a third party, which shall 504 include, but not be limited to, the promoting or selling of 505 services, goods, appliances, or drugs and the promoting or 506 advertising on any prescription form of a community pharmacy 507 unless the form also states âThis prescription may be filled at 508 any pharmacy of your choice.â 509 (p)âPerforming professional services which have not been 510 duly authorized by the patient or client, or her or his legal 511 representative, except as provided in s. 743.064, s. 766.103, or 512 s. 768.13. 513 (q)âPrescribing, dispensing, administering, mixing, or 514 otherwise preparing a legend drug, including any controlled 515 substance, other than in the course of the naturopathic 516 physicianâs professional practice. For the purposes of this 517 paragraph, it shall be legally presumed that prescribing, 518 dispensing, administering, mixing, or otherwise preparing legend 519 drugs, including all controlled substances, inappropriately or 520 in excessive or inappropriate quantities is not in the best 521 interest of the patient and is not in the course of the 522 naturopathic physicianâs professional practice, without regard 523 to her or his intent. 524 (r)âPrescribing, dispensing, or administering any medicinal 525 drug appearing on any schedule set forth in chapter 893 by the 526 naturopathic physician to herself or himself, except one 527 prescribed, dispensed, or administered to the naturopathic 528 physician by another practitioner authorized to prescribe, 529 dispense, or administer medicinal drugs. 530 (m)(s)âBeing unable to practice naturopathic medicine with 531 reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or 532 use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type 533 of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition. 534 In enforcing this paragraph, the department shall have, upon a 535 finding of the State Surgeon General or her or his designee that 536 probable cause exists to believe that the licensee is unable to 537 serve as a naturopathic doctor due to the reasons stated in this 538 paragraph, the department shall have the authority to issue an 539 order to compel the licensee, authority to compel a naturopathic 540 physician to submit to a mental or physical examination by a 541 physician physicians designated by the department. If the 542 licensee does not comply with such order, the departmentâs order 543 directing failure of a naturopathic physician to submit to such 544 an examination may be enforced by filing a petition for 545 enforcement in the circuit court for the county in which the 546 naturopathic doctor resides or does business. The naturopathic 547 doctor against whom the petition is filed may not be named or 548 identified by initials in any public court record or document, 549 and the proceedings must be closed to the public. The department 550 is entitled to the summary procedure provided in s. 51.011 when 551 so directed shall constitute an admission of the allegations 552 against her or him upon which a default and final order may be 553 entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of 554 evidence, unless the failure was due to circumstances beyond the 555 naturopathic physicianâs control. A naturopathic doctor subject 556 to an order issued physician affected under this paragraph must, 557 shall at reasonable intervals, be afforded an opportunity to 558 demonstrate that she or he can resume the competent practice of 559 naturopathic medicine with reasonable skill and safety to 560 patients. In any proceeding under this paragraph, neither the 561 record of proceedings nor the orders entered by the department 562 may be used against a naturopathic doctor physician in any other 563 proceeding. 564 (n)(t)âEngaging in gross or repeated malpractice or the 565 failure to practice naturopathic medicine with that level of 566 care, skill, and treatment which is recognized by a reasonably 567 prudent similar physician as being acceptable under similar 568 conditions and circumstances. The department shall give great 569 weight to the provisions of s. 766.102 when enforcing this 570 paragraph. 571 (u)âPerforming any procedure or prescribing any therapy 572 which, by the prevailing standards of medical practice in the 573 community, constitutes experimentation on a human subject, 574 without first obtaining full, informed, and written consent. 575 (o)(v)âPracticing or offering to practice beyond the scope 576 permitted by law or accepting and performing professional 577 responsibilities which the licensee knows or has reason to know 578 that she or he is not competent to perform. 579 (p)(w)âDelegating professional responsibilities to a person 580 when the licensee delegating such responsibilities knows or has 581 reason to know that such person is not qualified by training, 582 experience, or licensure to perform them. 583 (q)(x)âViolating a lawful order of the board the department 584 previously entered in a disciplinary hearing or failing to 585 comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board or 586 department. 587 (r)(y)âConspiring with another licensee or with any other 588 person to commit an act, or committing an act, which would tend 589 to coerce, intimidate, or preclude another licensee from 590 lawfully advertising her or his services. 591 (s)âEngaging in fraud or deceit or gross negligence, 592 incompetence, or misconduct in the operation of a course of 593 study. 594 (t)âFailing to comply with state, county, or municipal 595 regulations or reporting requirements relating to public health 596 and the control of contagious and infectious diseases 597 (z)âProcuring, or aiding or abetting in the procuring of, 598 an unlawful termination of pregnancy. 599 (aa)âPresigning blank prescription forms. 600 (bb)âPrescribing by the naturopathic physician for office 601 use any medicinal drug appearing on Schedule II in chapter 893. 602 (cc)âPrescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering, 603 supplying, selling, or giving any drug which is an amphetamine 604 or sympathomimetic amine drug, or a compound designated pursuant 605 to chapter 893 as a Schedule II controlled substance to or for 606 any person except for: 607 1.âThe treatment of narcolepsy; hyperkinesis; behavioral 608 syndrome in children characterized by the developmentally 609 inappropriate symptoms of moderate to severe distractability, 610 short attention span, hyperactivity, emotional lability, and 611 impulsivity; or drug-induced brain dysfunction. 612 2.âThe differential diagnostic psychiatric evaluation of 613 depression or the treatment of depression shown to be refractory 614 to other therapeutic modalities. 615 3.âThe clinical investigation of the effects of such drugs 616 or compounds when an investigative protocol therefor is 617 submitted to, reviewed, and approved by the department before 618 such investigation is begun. 619 (dd)âPrescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering, 620 supplying, selling, or giving growth hormones, testosterone or 621 its analogs, human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), or other 622 hormones for the purpose of muscle building or to enhance 623 athletic performance. For the purposes of this subsection, the 624 term âmuscle buildingâ does not include the treatment of injured 625 muscle. A prescription written for the drug products listed 626 above may be dispensed by the pharmacist with the presumption 627 that the prescription is for legitimate medical use. 628 (u)(ee)âViolating any provision of this chapter or chapter 629 456, or any rule rules adopted pursuant thereto. 630 (2)âThe board department may enter an order denying 631 licensure or imposing any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) 632 against any applicant for licensure or licensee who is found 633 guilty of violating any provision of subsection (1) of this 634 section or who is found guilty of violating any provision of s. 635 456.072(1). 636 (3)âThe department shall not reinstate the license of a 637 naturopathic physician until such time as the department is 638 satisfied that such person has complied with all the terms and 639 conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is 640 capable of safely engaging in the practice of naturopathic 641 medicine. 642 (4)âThe board department shall by rule establish guidelines 643 for the disposition of disciplinary cases involving specific 644 types of violations. Such guidelines may include minimum and 645 maximum fines, periods of supervision or probation, or 646 conditions of probation or reissuance of a license. 647 Section 15.âSection 462.17, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 648 Section 16.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 649 20.43, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 650 20.43âDepartment of Health.âThere is created a Department 651 of Health. 652 (3)âThe following divisions of the Department of Health are 653 established: 654 (g)âDivision of Medical Quality Assurance, which is 655 responsible for the following boards and professions established 656 within the division: 657 1.âThe Board of Acupuncture, created under chapter 457. 658 2.âThe Board of Medicine, created under chapter 458. 659 3.âThe Board of Osteopathic Medicine, created under chapter 660 459. 661 4.âThe Board of Chiropractic Medicine, created under 662 chapter 460. 663 5.âThe Board of Podiatric Medicine, created under chapter 664 461. 665 6.âThe Board of Naturopathic Medicine Naturopathy, as 666 provided under chapter 462. 667 7.âThe Board of Optometry, created under chapter 463. 668 8.âThe Board of Nursing, created under part I of chapter 669 464. 670 9.âNursing assistants, as provided under part II of chapter 671 464. 672 10.âThe Board of Pharmacy, created under chapter 465. 673 11.âThe Board of Dentistry, created under chapter 466. 674 12.âMidwifery, as provided under chapter 467. 675 13.âThe Board of Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology, 676 created under part I of chapter 468. 677 14.âThe Board of Nursing Home Administrators, created under 678 part II of chapter 468. 679 15.âThe Board of Occupational Therapy, created under part 680 III of chapter 468. 681 16.âRespiratory therapy, as provided under part V of 682 chapter 468. 683 17.âDietetics and nutrition practice, as provided under 684 part X of chapter 468. 685 18.âThe Board of Athletic Training, created under part XIII 686 of chapter 468. 687 19.âThe Board of Orthotists and Prosthetists, created under 688 part XIV of chapter 468. 689 20.âElectrolysis, as provided under chapter 478. 690 21.âThe Board of Massage Therapy, created under chapter 691 480. 692 22.âThe Board of Clinical Laboratory Personnel, created 693 under part I of chapter 483. 694 23.âMedical physicists, as provided under part II of 695 chapter 483. 696 24.âThe Board of Opticianry, created under part I of 697 chapter 484. 698 25.âThe Board of Hearing Aid Specialists, created under 699 part II of chapter 484. 700 26.âThe Board of Physical Therapy Practice, created under 701 chapter 486. 702 27.âThe Board of Psychology, created under chapter 490. 703 28.âSchool psychologists, as provided under chapter 490. 704 29.âThe Board of Clinical Social Work, Marriage and Family 705 Therapy, and Mental Health Counseling, created under chapter 706 491. 707 30.âEmergency medical technicians and paramedics, as 708 provided under part III of chapter 401. 709 Section 17.âSubsection (2) of section 381.0031, Florida 710 Statutes, is amended to read: 711 381.0031âEpidemiological research; report of diseases of 712 public health significance to department.â 713 (2)âAny practitioner licensed in this state to practice 714 medicine, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic medicine, 715 naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or veterinary medicine; any 716 licensed pharmacist authorized under a protocol with a 717 supervising physician under s. 465.1895, or a collaborative 718 pharmacy practice agreement, as defined in s. 465.1865, to 719 perform or order and evaluate laboratory and clinical tests; any 720 hospital licensed under part I of chapter 395; or any laboratory 721 appropriately certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 722 Services under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement 723 Amendments and the federal rules adopted thereunder which 724 diagnoses or suspects the existence of a disease of public 725 health significance shall immediately report the fact to the 726 Department of Health. 727 Section 18.âSubsection (11) of section 468.301, Florida 728 Statutes, is amended to read: 729 468.301âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 730 (11)ââLicensed practitionerâ means a person who is licensed 731 or otherwise authorized by law to practice medicine, podiatric 732 medicine, chiropody, osteopathic medicine, naturopathic medicine 733 naturopathy, or chiropractic medicine in this state. 734 Section 19.âSubsection (1) of section 476.044, Florida 735 Statutes, is amended to read: 736 476.044âExemptions.âThis chapter does not apply to the 737 following persons when practicing pursuant to their professional 738 responsibilities and duties: 739 (1)âPersons authorized under the laws of this state to 740 practice medicine, surgery, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic 741 medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or podiatric 742 medicine; 743 Section 20.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 744 477.0135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 745 477.0135âExemptions.â 746 (1)âThis chapter does not apply to the following persons 747 when practicing pursuant to their professional or occupational 748 responsibilities and duties: 749 (a)âPersons authorized under the laws of this state to 750 practice medicine, surgery, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic 751 medicine, massage therapy, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, or 752 podiatric medicine. 753 Section 21.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 485.003, 754 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 755 485.003âDefinitions.âIn construing this chapter, the words, 756 phrases, or terms, unless the context otherwise indicates, shall 757 have the following meanings: 758 (2)ââHealing artsâ shall mean the practice of medicine, 759 surgery, psychiatry, dentistry, osteopathic medicine, 760 chiropractic medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, 761 podiatric medicine, chiropody, psychology, clinical social work, 762 marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, and 763 optometry. 764 (3)ââPractitioner of the healing artsâ shall mean a person 765 licensed under the laws of the state to practice medicine, 766 surgery, psychiatry, dentistry, osteopathic medicine, 767 chiropractic medicine, naturopathic medicine naturopathy, 768 podiatric medicine, chiropody, psychology, clinical social work, 769 marriage and family therapy, mental health counseling, or 770 optometry within the scope of his or her professional training 771 and competence and within the purview of the statutes applicable 772 to his or her respective profession, and who may refer a patient 773 for treatment by a qualified person, who shall employ hypnotic 774 techniques under the supervision, direction, prescription, and 775 responsibility of such referring practitioner. 776 Section 22.âSubsection (1) of section 486.161, Florida 777 Statutes, is amended to read: 778 486.161âExemptions.â 779 (1)âNo provision of This chapter does not shall be 780 construed to prohibit any person licensed in this state from 781 using any physical agent as a part of, or incidental to, the 782 lawful practice of her or his profession under the statutes 783 applicable to the profession of chiropractic physician, 784 podiatric physician, doctor of medicine, massage therapist, 785 nurse, osteopathic physician or surgeon, occupational therapist, 786 or naturopathic doctor naturopath. 787 Section 23.âParagraph (h) of subsection (4) of section 788 627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 789 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 790 (4)âMEDICAL MALPRACTICE RISK APPORTIONMENT; ASSOCIATION 791 CONTRACTS AND PURCHASES.â 792 (h)âAs used in this subsection: 793 1.ââHealth care providerâ means hospitals licensed under 794 chapter 395; physicians licensed under chapter 458; osteopathic 795 physicians licensed under chapter 459; podiatric physicians 796 licensed under chapter 461; dentists licensed under chapter 466; 797 chiropractic physicians licensed under chapter 460; naturopathic 798 doctors naturopaths licensed under chapter 462; nurses licensed 799 under part I of chapter 464; midwives licensed under chapter 800 467; physician assistants licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 801 459; physical therapists and physical therapist assistants 802 licensed under chapter 486; health maintenance organizations 803 certificated under part I of chapter 641; ambulatory surgical 804 centers licensed under chapter 395; other medical facilities as 805 defined in subparagraph 2.; blood banks, plasma centers, 806 industrial clinics, and renal dialysis facilities; or 807 professional associations, partnerships, corporations, joint 808 ventures, or other associations for professional activity by 809 health care providers. 810 2.ââOther medical facilityâ means a facility the primary 811 purpose of which is to provide human medical diagnostic services 812 or a facility providing nonsurgical human medical treatment, to 813 which facility the patient is admitted and from which facility 814 the patient is discharged within the same working day, and which 815 facility is not part of a hospital. However, a facility existing 816 for the primary purpose of performing terminations of pregnancy 817 or an office maintained by a physician or dentist for the 818 practice of medicine may not be construed to be an âother 819 medical facility.â 820 3.ââHealth care facilityâ means any hospital licensed under 821 chapter 395, health maintenance organization certificated under 822 part I of chapter 641, ambulatory surgical center licensed under 823 chapter 395, or other medical facility as defined in 824 subparagraph 2. 825 Section 24.âSubsection (23) of section 893.02, Florida 826 Statutes, is amended to read: 827 893.02âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases as used 828 in this chapter shall have the following meanings, unless the 829 context otherwise requires: 830 (23)ââPractitionerâ means a physician licensed under 831 chapter 458, a dentist licensed under chapter 466, a 832 veterinarian licensed under chapter 474, an osteopathic 833 physician licensed under chapter 459, an advanced practice 834 registered nurse licensed under chapter 464, a naturopath 835 licensed under chapter 462, a certified optometrist licensed 836 under chapter 463, a psychiatric nurse as defined in s. 394.455, 837 a podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461, or a physician 838 assistant licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, provided 839 such practitioner holds a valid federal controlled substance 840 registry number. 841 Section 25.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 842 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 843 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 844 chart.â 845 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 846 (g)âLEVEL 7 847 848 849 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 850 316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death, failure to stop; leaving scene. 851 316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 852 316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury or death to another person; driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 853 327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 854 402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and negligence or intentional act resulting in great bodily harm, permanent disfiguration, permanent disability, or death. 855 409.920â(2)(b)1.a. 3rd Medicaid provider fraud; $10,000 or less. 856 409.920â(2)(b)1.b. 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more than $10,000, but less than $50,000. 857 456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care profession without a license. 858 456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care profession without a license which results in serious bodily injury. 859 458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a license. 860 459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine without a license. 861 460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic medicine without a license. 862 461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine without a license. 863 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without a license. 864 463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a license. 865 464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a license. 866 465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a license. 867 466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene without a license. 868 467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a license. 869 468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care services without a license. 870 483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical laboratory personnel without a license. 871 483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics without a license. 872 484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical devices without a prescription. 873 484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without a license. 874 494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of chapter 494 in which the total money and property unlawfully obtained exceeded $50,000 and there were five or more victims. 875 560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by a money services business. 876 560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 877 655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by financial institution. 878 775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to register; failure to renew driver license or identification card; other registration violations. 879 775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where children regularly congregate. 880 775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual predator; harbor or conceal a sexual predator. 881 782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a person by a person other than the perpetrator or the perpetrator of an attempted felony. 882 782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or culpable negligence of another (manslaughter). 883 782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or unborn child by the operation of a motor vehicle in a reckless manner (vehicular homicide). 884 782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the operation of a vessel in a reckless manner (vessel homicide). 885 784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery; intentionally causing great bodily harm or disfigurement. 886 784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using deadly weapon. 887 784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator aware victim pregnant. 888 784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of injunction or court order. 889 784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of court order. 890 784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law enforcement officer. 891 784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually violent predators facility staff. 892 784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 893 784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified official or employee. 894 784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 895 784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code inspector. 896 787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child; second or subsequent offense. 897 787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with a specified prior conviction. 898 787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an adult. 899 787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services by the transfer or transport of an adult from outside Florida to within the state. 900 790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation subsequent to previous conviction of s. 790.07(1) or (2). 901 790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun under specified circumstances. 902 790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or deliver hoax bomb. 903 790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use any hoax bomb while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 904 790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction. 905 790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 906 790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a person who qualifies for the penalty enhancements provided for in s. 874.04. 907 794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation; consent by a parent, guardian, or a person in custodial authority to a victim younger than 18 years of age. 908 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 2nd offense. 909 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 3rd and subsequent offense. 910 800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim younger than 12 years of age; offender younger than 18 years of age. 911 800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years of age; offender 18 years of age or older. 912 800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years; offender 18 years or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 913 806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by fire or explosive. 914 810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 915 810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 916 810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 917 810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized emergency vehicle. 918 812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at $100,000 or more or a semitrailer deployed by a law enforcement officer; property stolen while causing other property damage; 1st degree grand theft. 919 812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued at less than $50,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 920 812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency medical equipment; 2nd degree grand theft. 921 812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law enforcement equipment from authorized emergency vehicle. 922 812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree; firearm with previous conviction of s. 812.014(2)(c)5. 923 812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $50,000 or more. 924 812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates, organizes, plans, etc., the theft of property and traffics in stolen property. 925 812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching. 926 812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 927 817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value greater than $50,000. 928 817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle accident victims with intent to defraud. 929 817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or participating in an intentional motor vehicle collision. 930 817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value $100,000 or more. 931 817.2341â(2)(b) & (3)(b) 1st Making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity which are a significant cause of the insolvency of that entity. 932 817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud. 933 817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud. 934 817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document. 935 817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 936 825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or disabled adult causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 937 825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 938 827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 939 827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under 16 years of age by person 21 years of age or older. 940 827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a sexual performance, or promote or direct such performance. 941 827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 942 837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about alleged capital felony to a law enforcement officer. 943 838.015 2nd Bribery. 944 838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward for official behavior. 945 838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public servant. 946 838.22 2nd Bid tampering. 947 843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public officer or employee. 948 843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal process. 949 843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public officer or employee. 950 847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a computer service, to commit an unlawful sex act. 951 847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to commit an unlawful sex act. 952 872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body. 953 874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 954 874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises criminal gang-related activity. 955 893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 956 893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5., within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 957 893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 958 893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 25 lbs., less than 2,000 lbs. 959 893.135â(1)(b)1.a. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 28 grams, less than 200 grams. 960 893.135â(1)(c)1.a. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 4 grams, less than 14 grams. 961 893.135â(1)(c)2.a. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28 grams or more, less than 50 grams. 962 893.135â(1)(c)2.b. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 963 893.135â(1)(c)3.a. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 964 893.135â(1)(c)3.b. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14 grams or more, less than 25 grams. 965 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(I) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 966 893.135â(1)(d)1.a. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 967 893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 200 grams or more, less than 5 kilograms. 968 893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 969 893.135â(1)(g)1.a. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 970 893.135â(1)(h)1.a. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 971 893.135â(1)(j)1.a. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 972 893.135â(1)(k)2.a. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 10 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 973 893.135â(1)(m)2.a. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 280 grams or more, less than 500 grams. 974 893.135â(1)(m)2.b. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 500 grams or more, less than 1,000 grams. 975 893.135â(1)(n)2.a. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 14 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 976 893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 977 896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 978 896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 979 943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating permanent residence; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 980 943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in state after indicating intent to leave; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 981 943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 982 943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 983 943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 984 944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 985 944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 986 944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 987 944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 988 985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 989 985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 990 985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 991 992 Section 26.âThis act shall take effect December 31, 2026.